Utah statutes.
40-8-21.   Temporary suspension or termination of operations -- Notice to division -- Evaluation and inspection -- Release of surety -- Evidence of compliance.

(1)  In the case of a temporary suspension of mining operations, excluding labor disputes, expected to be in excess of five years' duration, the operator shall, within 30 days, notify the division.

(2)  In the case of a termination of mining operations or a suspension of such operations expected to extend for a period in excess of two years, the operator shall furnish the division with such data as it may require in order to evaluate the status of the mining operation, performance under the reclamation plan, and the probable future status of the mineral deposit and condition of the land affected.

(3)  Upon receipt of notification of termination or extended suspension, the division shall, within 30 days, cause an inspection to be made of the property and take whatever action may be appropriate in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter.

(4)  The full release by the division of surety posted under an approved notice of intention shall be prima facie evidence that the operator has fully complied with the provisions of this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 147, 1987 General Session

